Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1324
Surveys; authority to enter land; damages.

The department shall have authority to enter upon any property to make surveys, examinations, investigations, and tests, and to acquire other necessary and relevant data in contemplation of (1) establishing the location of a road, street, or highway, (2) acquiring land, property, and road building materials, or (3) performing other operations incident to highway construction, reconstruction, or maintenance. Entry upon any property, pursuant to this section, shall not be considered to be a legal trespass and no damages shall be recoverable on that account alone. In case of any actual or demonstrable damages to the premises, the department shall pay the owner of the premises the amount of the damages. Upon the failure of the landowner and the department to agree upon the amount of damages, the landowner, in addition to any other available remedy, may file a petition as provided for in section 76-705.

Laws 1955, c. 148, § 24, p. 428.

Department of Roads has authority to enter upon any property to make surveys. State v. Merritt Brothers Sand & Gravel Co., 180 Neb. 660, 144 N.W.2d 180 (1966).